Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1164.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 79 of Enrolled Senate Bill
No. 1177 of the 2nd Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, is
amended to read as follows:
There is hereby appropriated to the Department of Mental Health
and Substance Abuse Services from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the Alcoholic Beverage Control Fund of the State
Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025 June 30, 2027, the
sum of Twelve Million One Hundred Eighty-five Thousand Six Hundred
Fifty Dollars ($12,185,650.00) or so much thereof as may be
necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the Department by law.

SECTION 2. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of
Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services from any monies not
otherwise appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State
Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of One
Million Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,200,000.00) or so much
thereof as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the
Department by law.
SECTION 3. From the funds appropriated to the Department of
Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services in Enrolled Senate Bill
No. 1177 of the 2nd Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature and in
Section 2 of this act, the Department is authorized to transfer the
sum of Five Million Nine Hundred Sixty-nine Thousand Four Hundred
Sixty-three Dollars ($5,969,463.00) to the 9-8-8 Lifeline Revolving
Fund, created in Enrolled Senate Bill No. 1369 of the 2nd Session of
the 60th Oklahoma Legislature.
SECTION 4. From the funds appropriated to the Department of
Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services in Enrolled Senate Bill
No. 1177 of the 2nd Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, the
sum of Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00) shall be used for
program growth and to replace funding no longer available due to the
reduction of federal matching dollars.
SECTION 5. From the funds appropriated to the Department of
Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services in Enrolled Senate Bill
No. 1177 of the 2nd Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, the
sum of Thirty-nine Million Six Hundred Twenty Thousand Nine Hundred
Eleven Dollars ($39,620,911.00) shall be used to meet the
obligations required in the consent decree pursuant to case number
23-cv-81-GKF-JFJ filed in the United States District Court for the
Northern District of Oklahoma.
SECTION 6. From the funds appropriated to the Department of
Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services in Enrolled Senate Bill
No. 1177 of the 2nd Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, the
sum of One Million Three Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,300,000.00)
shall be used to maintain services for veterans and their families.
SECTION 7. The Commissioner of Mental Health and Substance
Abuse Services may request through the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services the early transfer by the
ENR. S. B. NO. 1164 Page 2

Oklahoma Tax Commission of tax collections to the General Revenue
Fund for the purpose of early allocation to the Department of Mental
Health and Substance Abuse Services’ disbursing funds to alleviate
cash flow problems.
SECTION 8. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 9. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1164 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 14th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 16th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1164 Page 4